Maryland, session 2025, SB0840.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(a) On or before October 1, 2025, the Maryland Department of Health shall
publish on its website a schedule for the issuance of a solicitation for the procurement of a
Surveillance and Utilization Review Subsystem of the Medicaid Management Information
System.
(b) At least 60 days before the issuance of a solicitation described under
subsection (a) of this section, the Maryland Department of Health shall publish on its
website written notice of the contracting procedures, requirements, and timetables.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0840*